Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.6 The Edward O. Hawkins and Thomas C. Slater Medical Marijuana Act

21-28.6-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Edward O. Hawkins and Thomas C. Slater Medical Marijuana Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1.

21-28.6-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Modern medical research has discovered beneficial uses for marijuana in treating or alleviating pain, nausea, and other symptoms associated with certain debilitating medical conditions, as found by the National Academy of Sciences’ Institute of Medicine in March 1999.

According to the U.S. Sentencing Commission and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, ninety-nine (99) out of every one hundred (100) marijuana arrests in the United States are made under state law, rather than under federal law. Consequently, changing state law will have the practical effect of protecting from arrest the vast majority of seriously ill people who have a medical need to use marijuana.

Although federal law currently prohibits any use of marijuana, the laws of Alaska, California, Colorado, Hawaii, Maine, Montana, Nevada, Oregon, Vermont, and Washington permit the medical use and cultivation of marijuana. Rhode Island joins in this effort for the health and welfare of its citizens.

States are not required to enforce federal law or prosecute people for engaging in activities prohibited by federal law. Therefore, compliance with this chapter does not put the state of Rhode Island in violation of federal law.

State law should make a distinction between the medical and nonmedical use of marijuana. Hence, the purpose of this chapter is to protect patients with debilitating medical conditions, and their physicians and primary caregivers, from arrest and prosecution, criminal and other penalties, and property forfeiture if such patients engage in the medical use of marijuana.

The general assembly enacts this chapter pursuant to its police power to enact legislation for the protection of the health of its citizens, as reserved to the state in the Tenth Amendment of the United States Constitution.

It is in the state’s interests of public safety, public welfare, and the integrity of the medical marijuana program to ensure that the possession and cultivation of marijuana for the sole purpose of medical use for alleviating symptoms caused by debilitating medical conditions is adequately regulated.

The goal of the medical marijuana program is to create a system that is transparent, safe, and responsive to the needs of patients. Consequently, the medical marijuana program requires regulation and a comprehensive regulatory structure that allows for oversight over all suppliers of medical marijuana while ensuring both safety and patient access.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 515, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 1.

21-28.6-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Authorized purchaser” means a natural person who is at least twenty-one (21) years old and who is registered with the department of health for the purposes of assisting a qualifying patient in purchasing marijuana from a compassion center. An authorized purchaser may assist no more than one patient, and is prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the use of the qualifying patient. An authorized purchaser shall be registered with the department of health and shall possesses a valid registry identification card.

“Cannabis” means all parts of the plant of the genus marijuana, also known as marijuana sativa L. whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin regardless of cannabinoid content or cannabinoid potency including “marijuana,” and “industrial hemp” or “industrial hemp products” which satisfy the requirements of chapter 26 of title 2.

“Cannabis testing laboratory” means a third-party analytical testing laboratory licensed by the department of health, in coordination with the department of business regulation, to collect and test samples of cannabis.

“Cardholder” means a person who has been registered or licensed with the department of health or the department of business regulation pursuant to this chapter and possesses a valid registry identification card or license.

“Commercial unit” means a building, or other space within a commercial or industrial building, for use by one business or person and is rented or owned by that business or person.

“Compassion center” means a not-for-profit corporation, subject to the provisions of chapter 6 of title 7, and is licensed under §

21-28.6-12

, that acquires, possesses, cultivates, manufactures, delivers, transfers, transports, supplies, or dispenses medical marijuana, and/or related supplies and educational materials, to patient cardholders and/or their registered caregiver cardholder or authorized purchaser.

“Compassion center cardholder” means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer, or agent of a compassion center who has registered with the department of business regulation and has been issued and possesses a valid, registry identification card.

“Debilitating medical condition” means:

Cancer, glaucoma, positive status for human immunodeficiency virus, acquired immune deficiency syndrome, Hepatitis C, post-traumatic stress disorder, or the treatment of these conditions;

A chronic or debilitating disease or medical condition, or its treatment, that produces one or more of the following: cachexia or wasting syndrome; severe, debilitating, chronic pain; severe nausea; seizures, including but not limited to, those characteristic of epilepsy; or severe and persistent muscle spasms, including but not limited to, those characteristic of multiple sclerosis or Crohn’s disease; or agitation of Alzheimer’s Disease; or

Any other medical condition or its treatment approved by the department of health, as provided for in §

21-28.6-5

.

“Department of business regulation” means the office of cannabis regulation within the Rhode Island department of business regulation or its successor agency.

“Department of health” means the Rhode Island department of health or its successor agency.

“Department of public safety” means the Rhode Island department of public safety or its successor agency.

“Dried marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of the marijuana plant as defined by regulations promulgated by the department of business regulation.

“Dwelling unit” means the room, or group of rooms, within a residential dwelling used or intended for use by one family or household, or by no more than three (3) unrelated individuals, with facilities for living, sleeping, sanitation, cooking, and eating.

“Equivalent amount” means the portion of usable marijuana, be it in extracted, edible, concentrated, or any other form, found to be equal to a portion of dried marijuana, as defined by regulations promulgated by the department of business regulation.

“Immature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant, rooted or unrooted, with no observable flower or buds.

“Licensed medical marijuana cultivator” means a person or entity, as identified in §

43-3-6

, who or that has been licensed by the department of business regulation to cultivate medical marijuana pursuant to §

21-28.6-16

.

“Marijuana” has the meaning given that term in §

21-28-1.02

.

“Marijuana establishment licensee” means any person or entity licensed by the department of business regulation under this chapter whose license permits it to engage in or conduct activities in connection with the medical marijuana program. “Marijuana establishment licensees” shall include compassion centers, medical marijuana cultivators, and cannabis testing laboratories.

“Mature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that has flowers or buds that are readily observable by an unaided visual examination.

“Medical marijuana emporium” means any establishment, facility or club, whether operated for-profit or nonprofit, or any commercial unit, at which the sale, distribution, transfer, or use of medical marijuana or medical marijuana products is proposed and/or occurs to, by or among registered patients, registered caregivers, authorized purchaser cardholders or any other person. This shall not include a compassion center regulated and licensed by the department of business regulation pursuant to the terms of this chapter.

“Medical marijuana” means marijuana and marijuana products that satisfy the requirements of this chapter and have been given the designation of “medical marijuana” due to dose, potency, form. Medical marijuana products are only available for use by patient cardholders, and may only be sold to or possessed by patient cardholders, or their registered caregiver, or authorized purchaser in accordance with this chapter. Medical marijuana may not be sold to, possessed by, manufactured by, or used except as permitted under this chapter.

“Medical marijuana plant tag set” or “plant tag” means any tag, identifier, registration, certificate, or inventory tracking system authorized or issued by the department or which the department requires be used for the lawful possession and cultivation of medical marijuana plants in accordance with this chapter.

“Medical use” means the acquisition, possession, cultivation, manufacture, use, delivery, transfer, or transportation of medical marijuana or paraphernalia relating to the consumption of marijuana to alleviate a patient cardholder’s debilitating medical condition or symptoms associated with the medical condition in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

“Practitioner” means a person who is licensed with authority to prescribe drugs pursuant to chapters 34, 37, and 54 of title 5, who may provide a qualifying patient with a written certification in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department of health.

“Primary caregiver” means a natural person who is at least twenty-one (21) years old who is registered under this chapter in order to, and who may assist one qualifying patient, but no more than five (5) qualifying patients, with their medical use of marijuana, provided that a qualified patient may also serve as his or her own primary caregiver subject to the registration and requirements set forth in §

21-28.6-4

.

“Qualifying patient” means a person who has been certified by a practitioner as having a debilitating medical condition and is a resident of Rhode Island.

“Registry identification card” means a document issued by the department of health or the department of business regulation, as applicable, that identifies a person as a registered qualifying patient, a registered primary caregiver, or authorized purchaser, or a document issued by the department of business regulation that identifies a person as a registered principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer, or agent of a compassion center, licensed medical marijuana cultivator, cannabis testing lab, or any other medical marijuana licensee.

“Unusable marijuana” means marijuana seeds, stalks, and unusable roots and shall not count towards any weight-based possession limits established in this chapter.

“Usable marijuana” means the leaves and flowers of the marijuana plant, and any mixture or preparation thereof, but does not include the seeds, stalks, and roots of the plant.

“Wet marijuana” means the harvested leaves and flowers of the marijuana plant before they have reached a dry state, as defined by regulations promulgated by the department of health and department of business regulation.

“Written certification” means a statement signed by a practitioner, stating that, in the practitioner’s professional opinion, the potential benefits of the medical use of marijuana would likely outweigh the health risks for the qualifying patient. A written certification shall be made only in the course of a bona fide, practitioner-patient relationship after the practitioner has completed a full assessment of the qualifying patient’s medical history. The written certification shall specify the qualifying patient’s debilitating medical condition or conditions which may include the qualifying patient’s relevant medical records.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 515, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 415, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5.

21-28.6-4.
Protections for the medical use of marijuana.

A qualifying patient cardholder who has in his or her possession a registry identification card shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, solely for the medical use of medical marijuana; provided that the qualifying patient cardholder possesses an amount of medical marijuana that does not exceed twelve (12) mature marijuana plants and twelve (12) immature marijuana plants that are accompanied by valid medical marijuana plant tags, two and one-half ounces (2.5 oz.) of dried medical marijuana, or its equivalent amount which satisfies the requirements of this chapter, and an amount of wet medical marijuana to be set by regulations promulgated by the department of business regulation. The plants shall be stored in an indoor facility. Marijuana plants and the marijuana they produce shall only be grown, stored, manufactured, and processed in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department of business regulation;

An authorized purchaser who has in his or her possession a registry identification card shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for the possession of medical marijuana; provided that the authorized purchaser possesses an amount of medical marijuana that does not exceed two and one-half (2.5) ounces of usable marijuana, or its equivalent amount, and this medical marijuana was purchased legally from a compassion center for the use of their designated qualifying patient.

A qualifying patient cardholder, who has in his or her possession a registry identification card, shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for selling, giving, or distributing, on or before December 31, 2016, to a compassion center cardholder, medical marijuana of the type and in an amount not to exceed that set forth in subsection (a) that he or she has cultivated or manufactured pursuant to this chapter.

No school or landlord may refuse to enroll, or lease to, or otherwise penalize, a person solely for his or her status as a cardholder. Provided, however, due to the safety and welfare concern for other tenants, the property, and the public, as a whole, a landlord may have the discretion not to lease, or continue to lease, to a cardholder who cultivates, manufactures, processes, smokes, or vaporizes medical marijuana in the leased premises.

No employer may refuse to employ, or otherwise penalize, a person solely for his or her status as a cardholder, except:

To the extent employer action is taken with respect to such person’s:

Use or possession of marijuana or being under the influence of marijuana in any workplace;

Undertaking a task under the influence of marijuana when doing so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice or jeopardize workplace safety;

Operation, navigation, or actual physical control of any motor vehicle or other transport vehicle, aircraft, motorboat, machinery or equipment, or firearms while under the influence of marijuana; or

Violation of employment conditions pursuant to the terms of a collective bargaining agreement; or

Where the employer is a federal contractor or otherwise subject to federal law such that failure of the employer to take such action against the employee would cause the employer to lose a monetary or licensing related benefit.

A primary caregiver cardholder, who has in his or her possession a registry identification card, shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for assisting a patient cardholder, to whom he or she is connected through the department of health or department of business regulation’s registration process, with the medical use of medical marijuana; provided, that the primary caregiver cardholder possesses an amount of marijuana that does not exceed twelve (12) mature marijuana plants that are accompanied by valid medical marijuana tags, two and one-half (2.5) ounces of usable marijuana, or its equivalent amount, and an amount of wet marijuana set in regulations promulgated by the departments of health and business regulation for each qualified patient cardholder to whom he or she is connected through the department of health’s registration process.

A qualifying patient cardholder shall be allowed to possess a reasonable amount of unusable marijuana, including up to twelve (12) immature marijuana plants that are accompanied by valid medical marijuana tags. A primary caregiver cardholder shall be allowed to possess a reasonable amount of unusable marijuana, including up to twenty-four (24) immature marijuana plants that are accompanied by valid medical marijuana tags and an amount of wet marijuana set in regulations promulgated by the departments of health and business regulation.

There shall exist a presumption that a cardholder is engaged in the medical use of marijuana if the cardholder:

Is in possession of a registry identification card; and

Is in possession of an amount of marijuana that does not exceed the amount permitted under this chapter. Such presumption may be rebutted by evidence that conduct related to marijuana was not for the purpose of alleviating the qualifying patient’s debilitating medical condition or symptoms associated with the medical condition.

A primary caregiver cardholder may receive reimbursement for costs associated with assisting a qualifying patient cardholder’s medical use of marijuana. A primary caregiver cardholder may only receive reimbursement for the actual costs of goods, materials, services or utilities for which they have incurred expenses. A primary caregiver may not receive reimbursement or compensation for his or her time, knowledge, or expertise. Compensation shall not constitute sale of controlled substances under state law. The department of business regulation may promulgate regulations for the documentation and tracking of reimbursements and the transfer of medical marijuana between primary caregivers and their registered patients.

A primary caregiver cardholder, who has in his or her possession a registry identification card, shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for selling, giving, or distributing, on or before December 31, 2016, to a compassion center cardholder, marijuana, of the type, and in an amount not to exceed that set forth in subsection (f), if:

The primary caregiver cardholder cultivated the marijuana pursuant to this chapter, not to exceed the limits of subsection (f); and

Each qualifying patient cardholder the primary caregiver cardholder is connected with through the department of health’s registration process has been provided an adequate amount of the marijuana to meet his or her medical needs, not to exceed the limits of subsection (a).

A practitioner shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by the Rhode Island board of medical licensure and discipline, or an employer or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau solely for providing written certifications in accordance with this chapter and regulations promulgated by the department of health, or for otherwise stating that, in the practitioner’s professional opinion, the potential benefits of the medical marijuana would likely outweigh the health risks for a patient.

Any interest in, or right to, property that is possessed, owned, or used in connection with the lawful medical use of marijuana, or acts incidental to such use, shall not be forfeited.

No person shall be subject to arrest or prosecution for constructive possession, conspiracy, aiding and abetting, being an accessory, or any other offense, for simply being in the presence or vicinity of the medical use of marijuana as permitted under this chapter, or for assisting a qualifying patient cardholder with using or administering marijuana.

A practitioner, licensed with authority to prescribe drugs pursuant to chapters 34, 37, and 54 of title 5, or pharmacist, licensed under chapter 19.1 of title 5, or certified school nurse teacher, shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by an employer or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau solely for:

Discussing the benefits or health risks of medical marijuana or its interaction with other substances with a patient; or

Administering a non-smokable and non-vaporized form of medical marijuana in a school setting to a qualified patient registered in accordance with this chapter.

A qualifying patient or primary caregiver registry identification card, or its equivalent, issued under the laws of another state, U.S. territory, or the District of Columbia, to permit the medical use of marijuana by a patient with a debilitating medical condition, or to permit a person to assist with the medical use of marijuana by a patient with a debilitating medical condition, shall have the same force and effect as a registry identification card.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (f), no primary caregiver cardholder shall possess an amount of marijuana in excess of twenty-four (24) mature marijuana plants that are accompanied by valid medical marijuana tags and five ounces (5 oz.) of usable marijuana, or its equivalent, and an amount of wet medical marijuana set in regulations promulgated by the departments of health and business regulation for patient cardholders to whom he or she is connected through the department of health and/or department of business regulation registration process.

A qualifying patient or primary caregiver cardholder may give marijuana to another qualifying patient or primary caregiver cardholder to whom they are not connected by the department’s registration process, provided that no consideration is paid for the marijuana, and that the recipient does not exceed the limits specified in this section.

Qualifying patient cardholders and primary caregiver cardholders electing to grow marijuana shall only grow at one premises, and this premises shall be registered with the department of business regulation. Except for licensed compassion centers, and licensed cooperative cultivations, and licensed cultivators, no more than twenty-four (24) mature marijuana plants that are accompanied by valid medical marijuana tags shall be grown or otherwise located at any one dwelling unit or commercial unit. The number of qualifying patients or primary caregivers residing, owning, renting, growing, or otherwise operating at a dwelling or commercial unit does not affect this limit. The department of business regulation shall promulgate regulations to enforce this provision.

For the purposes of medical care, including organ transplants, a patient cardholder’s authorized use of marijuana shall be considered the equivalent of the authorized use of any other medication used at the direction of a physician, and shall not constitute the use of an illicit substance.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the general laws, the manufacture of marijuana using a solvent extraction process that includes the use of a compressed, flammable gas as a solvent by a patient cardholder or primary caregiver cardholder shall not be subject to the protections of this chapter.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary, nothing in this chapter or the general laws shall restrict or otherwise affect the manufacturing, distribution, transportation, sale, prescribing, and dispensing of a product that has been approved for marketing as a prescription medication by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and legally prescribed, nor shall hemp, in accordance with chapter 26 of title 2, be defined as marijuana or marihuana pursuant to this chapter, chapter 28 of this title or elsewhere in the general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 515, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5.

21-28.6-5.
Departments of health and business regulation to issue regulations.

Not later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this chapter, the department of health shall promulgate regulations governing the manner in which it shall consider petitions from the public to add debilitating medical conditions to those included in this chapter. In considering such petitions, the department of health shall include public notice of, and an opportunity to comment in a public hearing, upon such petitions. The department of health shall, after hearing, approve or deny such petitions within one hundred eighty (180) days of submission. The approval or denial of such a petition shall be considered a final department of health action, subject to judicial review. Jurisdiction and venue for judicial review are vested in the superior court. The denial of a petition shall not disqualify qualifying patients with that condition, if they have a debilitating medical condition as defined in §

21-28.6-3

. The denial of a petition shall not prevent a person with the denied condition from raising an affirmative defense.

Not later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this chapter, the department of health shall promulgate regulations governing the manner in which it shall consider applications for, and renewals of, registry identification cards for qualifying patients and authorized purchasers.

Not later than October 1, 2019, the department of business regulation shall promulgate regulations not inconsistent with law, to carry into effect the provisions of this section, governing the manner in which it shall consider applications for, and renewals of, registry identification cards for primary caregivers.

On and after December 1, 2022, no fee shall be charged for application, registration or renewal of an identification card for a patient or primary caregiver pursuant to the provisions of this section. Registry identification cards for qualifying patients, authorized purchasers and primary caregivers shall be issued without charge.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 443, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 495, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 5; P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 5, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 5, effective May 25, 2022.